dictsource/fo_rules
// Faroese prepared by Andras Eliassen, iSolveIT ApS (VoisIT)
// This file is UTF8 encoded.

// letter group B  voiceless consonants c,f,h,k,p,t,x,þ
// letter group F  p,t,k,s
// letter group H  j,r,v,

.L01  e i í y ý æ j    // front vowels
.L02  c f h k p t x s    // voiceless consonants
.L03  p t k

.replace
 x       xz    // so that it behaves as 2 letters


.group a
        a        a
        ag       e'a


.group á
        á        %oa


.group b
        b        b
        bb       b

.group c
        c        k
        c (e     s
        c (i     s


.group d
        d        d
        dd       d


.group ð
        ð        


.group e
        e        E:
        ei       ai


.group é
        é        jE:


.group f
        f        f
        ff       f


.group g
        g        g
        gg       g
     e) g
        g (i     dj
        g (e     dj


.group h
        h        h


.group i
        i        @
    tr) i        @


.group í
        í        ui:


.group j
        j        j


.group k
     _) k        k
        k        k
        k (i     tj
        k (e     tj
     

.group l
        l        l
        ll       l
        

.group m
        m        m


.group n
        n        n
        nn       n:


.group o
        o        O:
        o (CC    o


.group ó
        ó        i'ou:


.group p
        p        p


.group q
        q        k


.group r
        r        r
     o) rn       dn
     e) rn       dn

.group s
        s        s
        ss       ss2


.group t
     _) t        t
        t        t
        tt       t
        

.group u
        u        u


.group ú
        ú        u:


.group v
        v        v


.group w
        w        v


.group x
        x        ks
        xz       ks

.group y
        y        y


.group ý
        ý        ui:


.group z
        z        z
        zz       ts     // pizza


.group æ
        æ        @:


.group ö
        ö        W:


.group ø
        ø        W:


.group
        $        dOllari
